Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.220

Sewerage lien foreclosure—Parts—Tracts.

The city or town may foreclose its sewerage lien in an action in the superior court. All or any of the tracts subject to the lien may be proceeded against in the same action, and all parties appearing of record as owning or claiming to own, having or claiming to have any interest in or lien upon the tracts involved in the action shall be impleaded in the action as parties defendant.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.220. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-10, part.]